Missouri, session 2026, HB2227.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 620.1320, to read as follows:
620.1320. Beginning on September 1, 2026, each state department shall, on a
2 quarterly basis, report to the department of economic development all costs associated
3 with complying with federal regulations for the preceding quarter. The reports shall be
4 delivered to the general assembly and made available to the public on the department of
5 economic development's website.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.